trunk/resultats/catalan_i.aff
# =======================================================================================
# Corrector ortogràfic català
# Fitxer d'afixos i llista de paraules
# =======================================================================================
# Copyright (C) 2002, 2006 Joan Moratinos <jmo@softcatala.org>
# 
# This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU General Public License
# as published by the Free Software Foundation; either version 2
# of the License, or (at your option) any later version.
# 
# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.
# 
# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program; if not, write to the Free Software
# Foundation, Inc., 59 Temple Place - Suite 330, Boston, MA
# 02111-1307, USA.
# =======================================================================================
# Fonts: Diccionari de l'Institut d'Estudis Catalans
# Diccionari Català/Castellà - Castellà/Català de Francesc de B. Moll
# Diccionari d'Ispell d'Ignasi Labastida
# Amb aportacions de: Miquel Font, Francesc Xavier Moratinos, Jordi Mas
# =======================================================================================

# Sense afixació automàtica

allaffixes off

# Definició dels caràcters

defstringtype "list" "nroff" ".list"

wordchars	a	A
stringchar	à	À
stringchar	á	Á			# González
stringchar	ã	Ã			# São Paulo
wordchars	[b-c]	[B-C]
stringchar	ç	Ç
wordchars	[d-e]	[D-E]
stringchar	è	È
stringchar	é	É
wordchars	[f-i]	[F-I]
stringchar	í	Í
stringchar	ï	Ï
wordchars	[j-o]	[J-O]
stringchar	ñ	Ñ			# Muñoz
stringchar	ó	Ó
stringchar	ò	Ò
stringchar	ö	Ö			# röngten
wordchars	[p-u]	[P-U]
stringchar	ú	Ú
stringchar	ü	Ü
wordchars	[v-z]	[V-Z]
wordchars   [·]
wordchars   [-]
wordchars   [']

#
# TeX
#
altstringtype "tex" "TeX" ".tex" ".bib"

altstringchar	\`a		à
altstringchar	\'a		á
altstringchar	\`A		À
altstringchar	\'A		Á
altstringchar	"\c c"		ç
altstringchar	"\c C"		Ç
altstringchar	\`e		è
altstringchar	\`E		È
altstringchar	\'e		é
altstringchar	\'E		É
altstringchar	\'\i		í
altstringchar	\'\I		Í
altstringchar	\"\i		ï
altstringchar	\"\I		Ï
altstringchar	\'o		ó
altstringchar	\'O		Ó
altstringchar	\`o		ò
altstringchar	\`O		Ò
altstringchar	\"o		ö
altstringchar	\"O		Ö
altstringchar	\'u		ú
altstringchar	\'U		Ú
altstringchar	\"u		ü
altstringchar	\"U		Ü


# Relació de flags emprats

# Flag      A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
# Prefix                                              * *   * * 
# Sufix     * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *           
# Lliure                                                  X     

# Flag      a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
# Prefix                                                        
# Sufix                                                         
# Lliure    a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z 


# ------------------------------------------------------------


prefixes

flag  V:    # Article prefixat no combinable
    .                    > L'                   # l'home
    .                    > L'                   # L'Alcúdia
    A                    > L'A                  # l'Aire
    A                    > L'A                  # L'Aire
    A                    > S'A                  # s'Aire
    A                    > S'A                  # S'Aire
    À                    > L'À                  # l'Àguila
    À                    > L'À                  # L'Àguila
    À                    > S'À                  # s'Àguila
    À                    > S'À                  # S'Àguila
    E                    > L'E                  # l'Esperit
    E                    > L'E                  # L'Esperit
    E                    > S'E                  # s'Esperit
    E                    > S'E                  # S'Esperit
    È                    > L'È                  # l'Època
    È                    > L'È                  # L'Època
    È                    > S'È                  # s'Època
    È                    > S'È                  # S'Època
    É                    > L'É                  # 
    É                    > L'É                  # 
    É                    > S'É                  # 
    É                    > S'É                  # 
    I                    > L'I                  # l'Illa
    I                    > L'I                  # L'Illa
    I                    > S'I                  # s'Illa
    I                    > S'I                  # S'Illa
    Í                    > L'Í                  # 
    Í                    > L'Í                  # 
    Í                    > S'Í                  # 
    Í                    > S'Í                  # 
    O                    > L'O                  # l'Ordre
    O                    > L'O                  # L'Ordre
    O                    > S'O                  # s'Ordre
    O                    > S'O                  # S'Ordre
    Ò                    > L'Ò                  # l'Òliba
    Ò                    > L'Ò                  # L'Òliba
    Ò                    > S'Ò                  # s'Òliba
    Ò                    > S'Ò                  # S'Òliba
    Ó                    > L'Ó                  # 
    Ó                    > L'Ó                  # 
    Ó                    > S'Ó                  # 
    Ó                    > S'Ó                  # 
    U                    > L'U                  # l'Urna
    U                    > L'U                  # L'Urna
    U                    > S'U                  # s'Urna
    U                    > S'U                  # S'Urna
    Ú                    > L'Ú                  # l'Únic
    Ú                    > L'Ú                  # L'Únic
    Ú                    > S'Ú                  # s'Únic
    Ú                    > S'Ú                  # S'Únic
    H                    > L'H                  # l'Hora
    H                    > L'H                  # L'Hora
    H                    > S'H                  # s'Hora
    H                    > S'H                  # S'Hora

flag  W:    # Article personal
    [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]      > L'                   # l'Arnau
    [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]      > N'                   # n'Arnau
    [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]      > L'                   # L'Arnau
    [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]      > N'                   # N'Arnau
