trunk/resultats/catalan_i.dic
Abadessa/WY
Abat/WY
Abel/WY
Abellan/WY
Abellí/WY
Abraham/WY
Abril/WY
Absaló/WY
Abundància/WY
Aciscle/WY
Adalbert/WY
Adalsinda/WY
Adela/WY
Adelf/WY
Adelvina/WY
Adern/WY
Adriac/WY
Adroguer/WY
Adulf/WY
Afrodita/WY
Agapi/WY
Agatop/WY
Ageric/WY
Agileu/WY
Agofrè/WY
Agostenc/WY
Agrici/WY
Agràs/WY
Aguilar/WY
Aguilera/WY
Aguller/WY
Agustí/WY
Aiats/WY
Aiet/WY
Aiguasenosa/WY
Aimar/WY
Aiter/WY
Alabal/WY
Alabell/WY
Alabir/WY
Aladreu/WY
Alamir/WY
Alapedra/WY
Alaric/WY
Alarí/WY
Alavedra/WY
Albai/WY
Albalac/WY
Albanell/WY
Albanès/WY
Albelda/WY
Alberc/WY
Alberg/WY
Albern/WY
Albertina/WY
Alberó/WY
Albi/VWY
Albiny/WY
Albinyà/WY
Albià/WY
Albor/WY
Albuixec/WY
Albí/WY
Alcamí/WY
Alcocer/WY
Alcuí/WY
Alda/WY
Aldeguer/WY
Aldetruda/WY
Aldovar/WY
Aldrover/WY
Alegre/WY
Alegria/WY
Aleixandre/WY
Alemany/WY
Alerany/WY
Aleu/WY
Alfarràs/WY
Alfred/WY
Algaba/WY
Algarra/WY
Algueró/WY
Aliany/WY
Alipi/WY
Aller/WY
Almar/WY
Almeda/WY
Almirall/WY
Almunia/WY
Alorda/WY
Alpric/WY
Alqueró/WY
Alsó/WY
Altabó/WY
Altamar/WY
Altelló/WY
Altet/WY
Alubís/WY
Alzet/WY
Alzinelles/WY
Alòs/WY
Amanda/WY
Amarí/WY
Amet/WY
Amigó/WY
Amorat/WY
Amós/WY
Ancil·la/WY
Andrea/WY
Anfós/WY
Anglesill/WY
Anguita/WY
Anscari/WY
Anticó/WY
Antonijoan/WY
Antònia/WY
Aparici/WY
Apuleu/WY
Arafat/WY
Aranda/WY
Arbona/WY
Arcadi/WY
Ardement/WY
Arenols/WY
Argelaguet/WY
Argeric/WY
Aribert/WY
Aristió/WY
Armajac/WY
Armelles/WY
Arnald/WY
Arner/WY
Arnulf/WY
Arquerons/WY
Arroyo/WY
Artal/WY
Artigal/WY
Artimany/WY
Arxé/WY
Ascó/WY
Aspriuet/WY
Astor/WY
Atenògenes/WY
Aucell/WY
Auger/WY
Aulí/WY
Auremund/WY
Auspici/WY
Avellanet/WY
Avinent/WY
Azorín/WY
Edmund/WY
Egipcíaca/WY
Elena/WY
Elisabet/WY
Elvira/WY
Empèdocles/WY
Enguix/WY
Entreserra/WY
Ermengarda/WY
Erola/WY
Escaiola/WY
Esclasans/WY
Escortell/WY
Escurçac/WY
Espanyol/VWY
Espases/WY
Espigoler/WY
Espinet/WY
Espoi/WY
Espunyola/VWY
Esquerra/WY
Estadella/WY
Estanyol/WY
Esteller/WY
Esteve/WY
Estornell/WY
Estragué/WY
Eteri/WY
Eufrasi/WY
Eulàlia/WY
Eustaqui/WY
Eutropi/WY
Expedit/WY
Habacuc/WY
Henedina/WY
Hereters/WY
Hermínia/WY
Heràclides/WY
Hilda/WY
Homdedeu/WY
Horta/VWY
Hortolà/WY
Hubert/WY
Humiliana/WY
Ignasi/WY
Ingla/WY
Isaci/WY
Isaïes/WY
Ivó/WY
Obís/WY
Oferil/WY
Olimpi/WY
Oliver/WY
Olivós/WY
Oléo/WY
Onofre/WY
Ordi/WY
Orenç/WY
Oriell/WY
Orpina/WY
Ortega/WY
Ortiz/WY
Osca/WY
Osó/WY
Ou/WY
Uguella/WY
Ultesà/WY
Urgés/WY
Usard/WY
aballestada/EVY
abatussada/EVY
abiogènesi/EVY
abominable/EVY
abrasió/GVY
abrucesa/EVY
abstergit/BVY
acabat/BEVY
acaparada/EVY
acaulescent/EVY
accés/VY
acetós/JVY
aclamador/FVY
acollença/EVY
aconitasa/EVY
acostat/BVY
acrodínia/EVY
activat/BVY
acumulatiu/BVY
adaptat/BVY
adhesió/GVY
adjunta/DEVY
adoberia/EVY
adossada/EVY
adunació/GVY
adònic/FVY
aerotrèn/EVY
afaníptera/EVY
aferradissa/EVY
afinament/EVY
afoll/EVY
afrontat/BVY
agama/EVY
agilitació/GVY
agnàtica/EVY
agramaticalitat/EVY
agricultora/EVY
agudització/GVY
ahucada/EVY
aigüerada/EVY
aixopluc/EVY
alabastrí/HVY
alaroner/FVY
albergueria/EVY
alcalinització/GVY
aldehídic/FVY
alfabeta/EVY
algeriana/EVY
alifàtic/FVY
allenyament/EVY
allop/EVY
aloma/EVY
altercació/GVY
alumel/EVY
al·lel/EVY
al·lucinació/GVY
alíger/FVY
amanós/JVY
amativa/EVY
ambrosia/EVY
ametllat/BVY
amical/EVY
amitjanada/EVY
amoral/EVY
amoïnosa/EVY
amuntanyat/BVY
anacíclic/FVY
anal·lagmàtic/FVY
anastomòtic/FVY
andesitoide/EVY
anellada/EVY
angioma/EVY
anguiló/GVY
animisme/EVY
anoll/EVY
anserí/HVY
antetipus/EVY
anticoncepció/GVY
antiferromagnetisme/EVY
antijuridicitat/EVY
antipapa/EVY
antisci/EVY
antropòloga/EVY
anòmia/EVY
apedaçada/EVY
aplanador/FVY
apoquiment/EVY
aprofundiment/EVY
aquietada/EVY
arboritzada/EVY
aresta/EVY
aritmètica/EVY
arquegoniada/EVY
arrecerament/EVY
arronsada/EVY
articulista/EVY
ascaricida/EVY
asperulosa/EVY
assembleària/EVY
assonància/EVY
asèpsia/EVY
ateromatós/JVY
atrapamosques/EVY
atàxia/EVY
austríac/FVY
automoció/GVY
avalotapobles/EVY
avidolat/BVY
azotós/JVY
ecònoma/EVY
efímera/EVY
eixermim/EVY
electroerosionat/BVY
elm/EVY
embalum/EVY
emblemàtica/EVY
embreada/EVY
emfiteuta/EVY
emmidonada/EVY
emparamentat/BVY
empescat/BVY
emporxat/BVY
enantematosa/EVY
encanastrat/BVY
encatifat/BEVY
encistat/BVY
encorralat/BVY
endiablat/BVY
endurat/BVY
enfilada/EVY
enfutismat/BVY
engelosit/BVY
engruixida/EVY
enllepolit/BVY
enquimerat/BVY
enrogallat/BVY
ensobradora/EVY
entendridora/EVY
entovada/EVY
entrenada/EVY
entuixegat/BVY
enviduada/EVY
epentètic/FVY
epitaxial/EVY
equivocosa/EVY
erotitzada/EVY
esbatanat/BVY
esbrostada/EVY
escaleta/EVY
escapció/GVY
escarrollat/BVY
esclafinyat/BVY
escoltisme/EVY
escota/DEVY
escultura/EVY
esfetgegada/EVY
esglaiadora/EVY
esmaixadora/EVY
espacial/EVY
esparverat/BVY
espedaçat/BVY
espetarregat/BVY
espiroquetosi/EVY
esporgadís/BVY
esquamós/JVY
esquitllent/EVY
estalviada/EVY
esteatita/EVY
esternutatòria/EVY
estirènic/FVY
estrallada/EVY
estripall/EVY
estèrica/EVY
etimòloga/EVY
europeïtzada/EVY
exageradora/EVY
excrementós/JVY
exigibilitat/EVY
experiència/EVY
exsudació/GVY
extremisme/EVY
halòfit/EVY
heliòfil/FVY
hemàcit/EVY
hermitià/HVY
heterònom/FVY
hidromètric/FVY
hipofisiari/KVY
holàrtic/FVY
honra/DEVY
humus/EVY
ignorant/CEVY
imminent/EVY
impolaritzable/EVY
inapaivagable/EVY
incongru/EVY
indevot/FVY
inerme/EVY
informal/EVY
inobedient/EVY
instintiu/BVY
interferòmetre/EVY
introbable/EVY
irrefragable/EVY
isotònic/FVY
obligant/CEVY
obturació/GVY
octubrada/EVY
ofioide/EVY
olivar/CEVY
oncòtic/FVY
opiniosa/EVY
orde/EVY
orgànica/EVY
orsejada/EVY
osculador/FVY
ou/CEVYZ
uacari/EVY
undulipodi/EVY
urinocultiu/EVY
Àlvar/WY
Èdip/WY
àrabis/EVY
òfset/EVY
